Massachusetts, session 194th, H2725.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second sentence the following
sentence:- The No said number plates nor any part thereof shall not be covered or obscured with
any opaque, transparent, translucent or tinted material.
SECTION 2. Said section 6 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
If a law enforcement officer observes that a number plate is covered or obscured by an
opaque, transparent, translucent or tinted material, the officer may stop the motor vehicle and
issue the violator a citation.
SECTION 3. Section 7A of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “plates”, in line 38, the following words:- ; provided, that any number
of 2

plate covered or obscured by an opaque, transparent, translucent or tinted material shall be an
improper and unsafe condition.
SECTION 4. Section 7V of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “seven A”, in line 15, the following words:- ; and the requirement that
motor vehicles be issued a certificate of rejection for failing to comply with the prohibition in
section 6 against covering or obscuring a number plate with an opaque, transparent, translucent
or tinted material.
SECTION 5. Section 2 shall take effect 2 years following the passage of this act.
of 2